Alabama, session 2026rs, HB125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 16-33D-3 and 16-33D-6 of the Code
of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§16-33D-3
For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms
have the following meanings:
(1) ACADEMIC TERM. A portion of an academic year, such
as a quarter or semester, during which an institution of
higher education holds classes including, but not limited to,
Fall, Winter, Spring, or Summer semesters.
(2) ADULT LEARNER. An individual who is 25 22 years of
age or older and returning to college.
(3) ALABAMA RESIDENT. An individual who has been
classified as an in-state resident by an authorized
institution, who has established residency within this state
for at least a 12-month period prior to the beginning of the
term for which financial assistance is requested, and who is
in this state for other than a temporary purpose.
(4) APPROVED INSTITUTION. A state-supported institution
Page 1

(4) APPROVED INSTITUTION. A state-supported institution
HB125 Enrolled
of higher education or a private nonprofit institution of
higher education that satisfies all of the following:
a. Is accredited by the Southern Association of
Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges, or the Council on
Occupational Education.
b. Is eligible to receive Title IV federal student aid
program funds.
c. Maintains its primary headquarters in Alabama.
(5) AUTHORIZED INSTITUTION. An approved institution
that files a signed agreement with the commission to comply
with all rules and procedures of the ReEngage Alabama Grant
Program as provided by the commission.
(6) COMMISSION. The Alabama Commission on Higher
Education.
(7) CONTINUOUS ENROLLMENT. When an adult learner is
making academic progress toward degree completion without a
stop-out in enrollment of more than one consecutive semester
or quarter, such as Fall/Winter to Spring, Spring to
Summer/Fall, or Summer to Fall.
(8) ELIGIBLE PROGRAM. A nonsectarian, secular
educational program that is aligned with Alabama's high demand
workforce needs adopted by the Alabama Committee on
Credentialing and Career Pathways.
(9) ELIGIBLE STUDENT. An individual who completed the
Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA), and who is
in either of the following:
a. In pursuit of his or her first associate or
baccalaureate degree, who satisfies the criteria set out in
Page 2

baccalaureate degree, who satisfies the criteria set out in
HB125 Enrolled
this chapter, and who is found to be eligible by rules adopted
by the commission.
b. In pursuit of his or her first baccalaureate degree
following a two-year stop-out period after receiving his or
her first associate degree and did not previously receive a
grant award, satisfies the criteria set out in this chapter,
and is found to be eligible by rules adopted by the
commission.
(10) GRANT. A financial award by the State of Alabama
to defray the cost of tuition and mandatory fees to an
eligible adult learner who is currently enrolled in an
authorized institution.
(11) PROGRAM. The ReEngage Alabama Grant Program
created by this chapter.
(12) YEAR. An academic year that shall be divided into
Fall, Winter, Spring, and Summer terms. The term does not mean
calendar or fiscal year.
"§16-33D-6
(a) The program shall be used to provide grant award
payments for eligible adult learners up to the maximum award
amount of three thousand dollars ($3,000) for universities and
one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for community
colleges per academic semester for a full-time student.
Proportional awards shall be given for students taking six to
11 hours and students enrolled in less common academic terms,
such as quarters, Summer terms, and intersessions.
(b)(1) Each grant shall be renewable for the number of
terms normally required by the institution for the course of
Page 3

terms normally required by the institution for the course of
HB125 Enrolled
study in which the adult learner is enrolled as long as the
student is continuously enrolled until the student receives an
either of the following:
a. His or her first associate degree or a baccalaureate
degree.
b. His or her first baccalaureate degree following a
two-year stop-out period after receiving his or her first
associate degree without previously receiving a grant award.
(2) The commission shall grant a renewal upon
verification that the student remains an eligible student.
(c) Grant award payments shall be distributed directly
to the approved institution on behalf of the student during
the applicable year.
(d) The requirements of this chapter are contingent
upon available funding for the program.
100 (e) The commission shall determine the necessary
101 procedures for awarding grant award payments if the number of
102 eligible applicants and recipients exceeds available funding.
103 (f) Any funds appropriated to the program shall be
104 nonreverting.
105 (g) A percentage of the grant program's appropriations
106 may be expended for the operation and maintenance of the
107 program.
108 (h) Each authorized institution that enrolls an adult
109 learner who is eligible for the tuition and mandatory fees
110 benefits provided by this program shall take necessary action
111 to ensure that the student is aware of all other benefits that
112 he or she may be entitled to under any other federal and state
Page 4

he or she may be entitled to under any other federal and state
HB125 Enrolled
113 educational benefits, and any student grant or scholarship. In
114 order to receive the benefits provided by this program, the
115 student shall take the necessary steps to utilize all of the
116 above benefits."
117 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
118 1, 2026.
Page 5

1, 2026.
HB125 Enrolled
119
120
121
122
123
124
125
126
127 ________________________________________________
128 Speaker of the House of Representatives
129
130
131
132 ________________________________________________
133 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
134
135
136 House of Representatives
137
138 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
139 was passed by the House 15-Jan-26.
140
141 John Treadwell
142 Clerk
143
144
145
146
147
148 Senate 10-Mar-26 Passed
149
150
151
Page 6